District of Columbia statutes.
7-3005.01

Certification and participation by treatment providers.

To improve access to substance abuse rehabilitation and aftercare for persons needing addiction treatment services, the Director of the Department of Health (“Director”) is authorized to exercise procurement authority to carry out the purposes of this chapter independent of the Office of Contracting and Procurement. The Director may enter into provider agreements or other agreements only with providers certified under Chapter 23 of Title 29 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations. It shall no longer be necessary for providers to be certified under Chapter 24 of Title 29 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations in order to be eligible to provide services under the Choice in Drug Treatment Program. The Director shall exercise this authority consistent with Chapter 3A of Title 2; except that § 2-352.01(a) shall not apply.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-146, § 6a
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 5042, 52 DCR 7503
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 212, 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “consistent with Chapter 3A of Title 2; except that § 2-352.01(a) shall not apply” for “consistent with Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2, except with regard to the powers and duties outlined in § 2-301.05(a), (b), (c), and (e).”
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5042 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Short title of subtitle E of title V of Law 16-33: Section 5041 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle E of title V of the act may be cited as the Choice in Drug Treatment Amendment Act of 2005.